Nevada, session 83, AB2.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 333 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise prohibited by law or any other
applicable restriction on the use or disposition of the money used
for the purchase, any money provided to the State in the form of a
rebate for a purchase made with a procurement card must, after
deducting administrative costs, be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifty percent must be deposited into the Account to
Stabilize the Operation of the State Government created by NRS
353.288; and
(b) Fifty percent must be given to the using agency that made
the purchase.
2. The money:
(a) Deposited into the Account to Stabilize the Operation of the
State Government pursuant to subsection 1 must not be used to
replace or supplant funding available from other sources.
(b) Received by a using agency pursuant to subsection 1:
(1) Must not be used to replace or supplant funding
available from other sources; and
(2) May be used at the discretion of the head of the using
agency.
3. As used in this section, “procurement card” means a
charge card issued to a using agency or its authorized
representative for the purchase of goods and services pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB2*